Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 22-29-101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Special District Elections Act of 1994.”

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 22-29-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Director” or “district director” means a voting member of the governing body of a special district, regardless of what title is used in the principal act;

“Principal act” means the statutes under which a special district listed under W.S. 22-29-103(a) can be formed or is operating;

“Business day” means any day other than Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday in this state as designated in W.S.

8-4-101

;

“This act” means W.S.

22-29-101

through

22-29-601

.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “22-29-601” for “22-29-408” in (a)(iii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added present (a)(iii) and redesignated former (a)(iii) as (a)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 22-29-103.
Applicability to special districts; general provisions.

This act applies to the following districts as specified in subsection (b) of this section:

Special cemetery districts;

Conservation districts;

Fire protection districts, including county commission fire protection districts;

Flood control districts;

Hospital districts;

Improvement and service districts;

Special museum districts;

Rural health care districts;

Sanitary and improvement districts;

Water and sewer districts;

Watershed improvement districts;

Resort districts;

Senior health care districts;

Other districts as specified by law.

This act specifies requirements pertaining to elections and changes in the organization of the districts listed in subsection (a) of this section where the principal act is silent or unclear. Except as provided by W.S. 22-29-401(b), the specific provisions of a principal act are effective and controlling to the extent they conflict with this act.

If a proposed district crosses county boundaries, then any required filing with a county clerk shall be filed with or certified to the county clerks of the counties affected. Any action required or permitted by this act, a principal act or applicable rules to be undertaken by a county commission or the county commissioners shall be undertaken jointly by the county commissioners for each county involved. In undertaking joint action, each county commissioner’s vote shall be weighted in proportion to the number of county commissioners and the population of electors of the district residing within that commissioner’s county. The population of electors shall be determined by the most recent voter registration lists. Any consultation required of the county assessor or county treasurer shall be made jointly by the county assessor or county treasurer of all the affected counties.

If a district is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations or adopt ordinances or bylaws, the district shall file any rules and regulations it promulgates, ordinances or bylaws it adopts and any amendments thereto with the county clerk for each county in which it is located. No rule, regulation, ordinance or bylaw shall be effective unless filed in accordance with this subsection.

All special districts shall file a copy of the document authorizing formation or modification of boundaries, a citation to the law under which it is formed and a copy of an official map or legal description designating the geographical boundaries of the district or the changes to its geographical boundaries with the department of revenue, the county assessor and the county clerk in the county or counties within which the entity is located in accordance with the department’s rules adopted pursuant to W.S. 39-11-102(c)(xxiv) regarding tax districts and as follows:

Within ten (10) business days after the effective date of formation; and

Annually, by a date determined by the department, if a special district has changes to its geographical boundaries by enlargement, merger, consolidation, exclusion or dissolution in the preceding year.

The department of revenue in adopting rules implementing the provisions of subsection (e) of this section may accept in lieu of a document authorizing the original formation of a district a statement of the district secretary stating that the document is unavailable together with a map or other description of the current boundaries of the district which allows the department to accurately ascertain the property within the district.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 1; 2003, ch. 27, § 1; ch. 72, § 2; 2005, ch. 108, § 2; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 17, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

in subsection (e), inserted “in accordance with the department's rules adopted pursuant to W.S. 39-11-102(c)(xxiv) regarding tax districts and”; added subsection (f); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (e)(i), inserted “business.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iii), added “including county commission fire protection districts.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added present (a)(xiii) and redesignated former (a)(xiii) as (a)(xiv).

Purpose of act. —

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 3, provides: “It is the intent of this act to develop an accurate and comprehensive database of the property within each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of property taxes within that governmental entity. Regardless of the date of formation, each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of ad valorem taxes shall file a map or legal description designating the current geographical boundaries of the governmental entity with the department of revenue, the county assessor and the county clerk in the county or counties within which the entity is located in accordance with the department's rules regarding tax districts. Not later than August 1, 2005, the department shall notify each governmental entity subject to the provisions of this section of the entity's most recent filing with the department and whether that filing meets the requirements of this act. If a governmental entity subject to the provisions of this act has not met the requirements of this act, or if its most recent filing with the department is no longer accurate, it shall file not later than November 1, 2005 a map or other legal description of its current boundaries in accordance with this act and the department's rules on taxing districts. Thereafter, filings shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 22-29-102(a)(iii).

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 4, provides: “Notwithstanding W.S. 22-29-103(d) as created in section 1 of this act, rules, regulations, ordinances or bylaws duly adopted before January 1, 1995, by districts which are subject to this act are effective through March 31, 1995, without the requirements of filing. Nothing in this act shall affect the validity of contracts or other obligations of districts created before January 1, 1995.”

§ 22-29-104.
Definitions when principal act is silent.

When used in a principal act, the following definitions apply, unless the term is otherwise specifically defined in that principal act:

“Elector” means a qualified elector;

through (F) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

“Landowner” means a person holding record fee title to real property within the district or proposed district or a person obligated to pay general property taxes under a contract to purchase real property within the district or proposed district. It does not include a person who owns only personal property even though such personal property may be subject to levy. As used in this paragraph, “person” includes an individual, corporation, partnership, association or other entity owning land in the district provided the individual who signs the petition for a corporation, partnership or association presents the election judge with a written authorization to sign for the corporation, partnership or association;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

“Property owner” means a landowner;

“Qualified elector” means a natural person who:

Is a citizen of the United States;

Is a bona fide resident of the district or proposed district;

Will be at least eighteen (18) years of age on the day of the election at which he may offer to vote;

Is not currently adjudicated mentally incompetent;

Has not been convicted of a felony, or, if so convicted, has had his civil or voting rights restored; and

Has registered to vote.

“Resident” or “residence” means as defined in the Wyoming Election Code;

“Voter” means a qualified elector;

“Written authorization” means an affidavit filed with the county clerk setting forth a general legal description of the property owned, the street or common name address for the property, the name or names of all owners of the property described, and a statement that the person signing the written authorization is the only person having authority to act on behalf of the owner or owners of the property.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5; 2003, ch. 132, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-29-105.
Petitions; number of signatures required; contents of formation petition.

A petition to form a special district shall be signed by not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the landowners owning at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the assessed valuation of property within the area proposed to be established as a special district in one (1) or more counties or any part of a county, as shown by the assessment records of the property in said area.

A petition for enlargement of a district shall be signed by not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the voters owning not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the assessed valuation of property within the area proposed to be included. If there are no voters within an area proposed to be included in a district, an enlargement petition shall be signed by not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the landowners owning not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the assessed valuation of property within the area proposed to be included.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

A petition for merger and a petition for consolidation shall be signed by not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the voters owning not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the assessed valuation of property within each of the districts proposed to be included.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

A petition for dissolution shall be signed by not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the voters owning not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the assessed valuation of property within the district.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

The petition for formation shall state:

The proposed name for the district;

The boundaries of the district, including a map, and describe the lands situated therein with particularity;

A request that a district be formed under a principal act and pursuant to this act;

Describe generally the purpose of the proposed district and the services to be provided, acquired, operated or constructed;

In detail, the proposed method for financing improvements or services to be provided within the first year of operation after formation;

The number and names of persons willing to serve, or apply for election, as the initial board of directors of the district as required by the principal act;

Who shall be responsible for the costs associated with formation.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5; 2001, ch. 130, § 1.

§ 22-29-106.
Requirements for signers of petition; signer's withdrawal prohibited; chief petitioners designated.

This section applies to petitions authorized under a principal act or this act. Each person who signs a petition shall add after the signature the date of signing. If a person is signing the petition as an elector, the person shall add after his signature the person’s date of birth and place of residence, giving street and number or a designation sufficient to enable the place of residence to be readily ascertained. If the signer is signing the petition as a landowner, the number of acres of land owned by the signer and the name of the county whose assessment roll is used for the purpose of determining the signer’s right to vote shall be stated in the body of the petition or indicated opposite the signature. If the signer is a legal representative of the owner, the signature shall be accompanied by the signer’s written authorization to sign as a legal representative.

After a petition has been offered for filing, a person may not withdraw his name therefrom.

A petition shall designate not more than three (3) persons as chief petitioners, setting forth their names and mailing addresses. A petition may consist of a single instrument or separate counterparts.

The secretary of state shall, after consultation with the county clerks, develop uniform petition forms which shall be used by special districts.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 22-29-102(a)(iii).

§ 22-29-107.
Requirements of filing petition; validity and certification of signatures.

A petition shall not be accepted for filing unless the signatures thereon have been secured within six (6) months of the date on which the first signature on the petition was affixed. Petitions required to be filed with the county commissioners shall be filed with the county clerk. Petitions required to be filed with the district board shall be filed with the secretary of the district board. It is not necessary to offer all counterparts of a petition for filing at the same time, but all counterparts when certified as provided by subsection (c) of this section shall be filed at the same time.

Within ten (10) business days after the date a petition is offered for filing, the county clerk or district secretary, as the case may be, shall examine the petition and determine whether it is signed by the requisite number of qualified signers. If the requisite number of qualified signers have signed the petition, the county clerk or district secretary shall file the petition. If the requisite number have not signed, the county clerk or district secretary shall so notify the chief petitioners and may return the petition to the petitioners.

A petition shall not be filed unless the certificate of the county clerk or the district secretary is attached thereto certifying that the county clerk or district secretary has verified the qualifications of the signers with the appropriate records, that the county clerk or district secretary has ascertained therefrom the number of qualified signers appearing on the petition, and that the petition is signed by the requisite number of qualified signers.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 5; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence in (b), inserted “business.”

§ 22-29-108.
Method of determining validity of landowner signatures.

In examining any petition required or permitted to be signed by landowners, the county clerk or district secretary shall disregard the signature of a person not shown as owner on the assessment roll unless prior to certification the secretary or county clerk is furnished with written evidence, satisfactory to the county clerk or district secretary, that the signer:

Is a legal representative of the owner;

Is entitled to be shown as owner of land on the assessment roll; or

Is a purchaser under a contract to purchase real property.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-29-109.
County commissioners' action on formation petition.

A petition for formation of a district shall be filed with the county commissioners. Before the petition is filed, the county assessor and the department of revenue shall review, within sixty (60) days of receiving notice of the petition, the boundaries of the proposed district for any conflict, overlap, gap or other boundary issue and make written comments thereon to be submitted with the petition. Further, the petition shall be approved by any agency required by the principal act to approve the petition. If the petition satisfies all requirements of the principal act, the county commissioners shall:

Set a date for a hearing on the petition. The hearing shall be held not less than forty-five (45) days nor more than ninety (90) days after the date the petition is filed;

The county commissioners shall cause notice of the hearing to be posted in at least three (3) public places and published by two (2) insertions in a newspaper of general circulation in that county or counties in which all or any part of the district is proposed to be located. The last of the notices shall be published at least ten (10) business days prior to the hearing. The notice shall state:

The purpose for which the district is to be formed;

The name and boundaries of the proposed district;

The time and place of the hearing on the petition; and

That all interested persons may appear and be heard.

Any person may appear at the hearing and shall be heard concerning any and all matters affecting the creation of the district, and a record of the proceedings shall be made and kept as a part of the public records of the board of county commissioners.

At the time stated in the notice, the county commissioners shall hear the petition and determine if the area could be benefited by the formation of the district. It may adjourn the hearing from time to time, but not exceeding four (4) weeks in all unless additional notice is given. The county commissioners may alter the boundaries set forth in the petition to either include or exclude territory. In determining the boundaries of the proposed district, the board shall consider the benefit the proposed district will have within the territory in or out of the proposed district. The commissioners shall not modify the boundaries so as to exclude from the proposed district any land which could be benefited by its formation, nor shall there be included any land which will not, in the judgment of the board, be benefited. In no event shall property which may be subject to a district assessment be included in the boundaries of a district if the owner of the assessed property is precluded by applicable state or federal law, rule or regulation from using the services provided by the formation of the district.

If the county commissioners determine, after consultation with the county assessor, that any land has been improperly omitted from the proposed district and that the owner has not appeared at the hearing, the commissioners shall continue the hearing and shall order notice given to the nonappearing owner requiring the owner to appear before it and show cause, if any, why the land of the owner should not be included in the proposed district. The notice shall be given either by posting and publication, in the same manner as notice of the original hearing and for the same period, or by personal service on each nonappearing owner. If notice is given by personal service, service shall be made at least ten (10) business days prior to the date fixed for the further hearing.

If within thirty (30) days after adjournment of the hearing, written protests, signed by the owners of at least thirty-five percent (35%) of assessed valuation of property included in the proposed district, are presented to the board of county commissioners, the proposal and the district shall fail.

If the county commissioners approve the petition for formation, as presented or as modified, the county commissioners shall enter an order declaring its approval. The order shall set forth the name of the proposed district and a description of the boundaries. Upon the entering of this order, the commissioners shall direct that the question of formation of the district and the election of the initial directors be submitted to the electors of the proposed district to be held in their respective counties by mail ballot or on the next election date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

which is at least one hundred ten (110) days after the expiration of the thirty (30) day period described in subsection (e) of this section.

Any errors or changes on the map or in the legal description shall be corrected, and the corrected version shall be displayed at the polls on election day or included in each mail ballot package. The map shall be developed after consultation with the county assessor for each affected county to ensure accuracy.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2003, ch. 27, § 1; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 101, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “business” in the second sentence in the introductory language of (a)(ii) and in the last sentence of (d).

The 2018 amendment,

in (f), substituted “one hundred ten (110) days” for “sixty (60) days” preceding “after the expiration of.”

Laws 2018, ch. 101, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

§ 22-29-110.
County clerk to publish proclamation; filing period.

Between one hundred one (101) and ninety-one (91) days before an organizational election held in conjunction with a primary or other August election, between ninety (90) and seventy (70) days before an organizational election held in conjunction with a May, general, November or mail ballot election held at any other time, the county clerk shall publish at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which all or part of the proposed district is situated a proclamation setting forth the date of the election, what county clerk is the filing officer, the question of formation, what offices are to be filled including the terms of the offices, the filing period for the offices and other pertinent election information. Minor errors in the proclamation shall not invalidate the forthcoming election.

Between ninety-six (96) and eighty-one (81) days before a formation election held in conjunction with a primary or other August election, between ninety (90) and seventy (70) days before a formation election held in conjunction with a May, general, November or mail ballot election held at any other time, candidates may file an application for election in the office of the county clerk. The principal act shall determine who is eligible to be a candidate. The application shall be in substantially the following form:

APPLICATION FOR ELECTIONSPECIAL DISTRICT DIRECTOR I, the undersigned, swear or affirm that I was born on , (year); that I have been a resident of district since , residing at ; that I am an elector or landowner (check which one for eligibility) of said district and I do hereby request that my name, , be printed on the ballot of the formation (or other) election to be held on day of , (year) as a candidate for the office of director for a term of years. I hereby declare that if I am elected, I will qualify for the office. Dated Signature of Candidate

Click to view

The county clerk shall publish a sample ballot with the question of formation and candidates for directors together with any other ballot proposition at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which all or part of the proposed district is located, at least ten (10) business days prior to the election.

No petitions for nomination shall be required in any election for district director. Any eligible person wishing to run for a special district office shall file an application for election as specified in subsection (b) of this section.

A county clerk receiving an application for election shall determine whether the person seeking election is an eligible candidate.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; ch. 115, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 101, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), deleted “Residence Address” from the form.

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (c), substituted “ten (10) business days” for “ten (10) days.”

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), substituted the
present language preceding “the county clerk” for “Not
more than fifty (50) and not less than forty (40) days, before the
organizational election,”; and, in (b), substituted the present
language preceding “candidates” for “Not more
than thirty-nine (39) and not less than thirty (30) days before the
formation election.”

Laws 2018,
ch. 101, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) and (b) substituted “general, November or mail ballot election held at any other time” for “general or other November election.”

§ 22-29-111.
Formation and initial director election.

The electors shall vote on the formation of the district and for the initial directors. Votes for write-in candidates for director shall be permitted.

The election shall be conducted under the direction of the county clerk and shall be at the expense of the sponsors of the proposed district. The sponsors may apply to the county for financial help under W.S. 22-29-113(c). If the proposed district is approved, and upon request of the sponsors or the county commissioners the special district shall reimburse the cost of the election.

The formation of the district is approved if a majority of the votes cast on the proposition vote “for” formation.

The county clerk shall conduct the election in accordance with W.S.

22-29-113

through

22-29-116

.

An elector casting a ballot may vote for any director candidate or other questions relating to the district, regardless of whether he voted against formation.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

If the proposition to form the district fails, the director candidacy questions are null and void.

If the formation question is approved, the county clerk shall send written notice of the formation to the public funds division of the department of audit within ten (10) business days of the canvass.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2,5; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (h), inserted “business.”

§ 22-29-112.
Subsequent director elections.

Subsequent director elections shall be held on the first Tuesday after the third Monday in March or on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in May or November, as determined by the district and shall accommodate staggered terms as set forth in the principal act.

All qualified electors are entitled to vote for the election of directors at all district elections subsequent to the formation election, called for the purpose of electing directors.

Not more than one hundred twenty (120) and not less than one hundred (100) days before the election, the secretary of the district shall publish at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which all or part of the district is situated, a proclamation setting forth the date of the election, what district officer is the filing officer, what offices are to be elected and the terms of office, the filing period for the offices and other pertinent election information.

Not more than ninety (90) nor less than seventy (70) days previous to the holding of a subsequent director election, candidates for the office of trustees of special districts shall file with the secretary of the district an application for election in substantial conformance with the form set forth in W.S. 22-29-110(b). The names of all qualified candidates so filed shall be printed on the ballot.

The name of all qualified candidates shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the district is located not later than ten (10) business days prior to the date of such election.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (e), inserted “business.”

§ 22-29-113.
General provisions relating to special district elections.

In a special district election not held in conjunction with a general or statewide special election, absentee voting shall be conducted in accordance with rules promulgated by the secretary of state under W.S.

22-29-114

which shall be consistent with procedures for mail ballot elections.

In a special district election the following rules shall apply:

An elector casting a ballot may write in the name of any person for a director office;

The person or persons receiving the largest number of votes is elected to office;

Candidates for director offices shall not be required to file campaign finance reports under W.S.

22-25-101

through

22-25-115

.

All special district elections which are not conducted in conjunction with any other election, shall be at the expense of the district. Provided, however, any district may apply to the county for financial help to cover election expenses. The county commissioners, in their sole discretion, shall determine whether the county provides election financial help to special districts. For special district elections conducted in conjunction with other elections, the special district may be required to pay only those expenses which are reasonably attributable or allocable to the district’s participation in the election. The expenses shall not include any fixed cost associated with an election.

Each year, each special district subject to this act shall file with the county commissioners and county clerk a list of the names, addresses and terms of the current directors. The filing deadline is the last day of April.

No special registration shall be held for any election authorized under this chapter. Any voter not otherwise registered who makes an affidavit evidencing his qualifications to vote is deemed registered for that election.

In the event the establishment of a district shall fail by protest as provided in W.S. 22-29-109(d), no action to establish such district, or any part thereof, may again be commenced for a period of six (6) months. In the event the establishment of the district shall fail as a result of being defeated at a public election no action to establish such district, or any part thereof, may again be commenced for a period of one (1) year.

No informalities in the conduct of the formation or related matters or subsequent director elections shall invalidate the formation or election results if notice is given substantially as provided in this chapter and the election is fairly conducted.

The official ballot shall contain the following information:

The name of the district;

The county or counties in which the district is located and the date of the election;

The number of offices to be filled, the length of term for each office, and the number and names of candidates for each office for whom each voter is entitled to vote;

Any ballot proposition upon which the electors are required to vote.

The names of candidates shall appear without party designation, one (1) name to a line. Sufficient blank lines for write-in candidates shall be provided for each office.

A tie vote shall be broken by lots cast by the canvassing authority.

All special district elections, including mail ballot elections, shall be overseen by the county clerk in the county wherein the special district exists. If the special district exists in more than one (1) county, the county clerk of the county wherein the largest portion of the special district exists shall oversee the election. The county clerk shall determine whether the election shall be conducted by the county clerk or the special district, taking into account each special district’s expertise, manpower and ability to conduct an election. “Oversee” as used in this subsection may include training, advice or assistance but does not include responsibility for the actions, conduct or outcome of the election unless the county clerk conducts the election.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-29-112

; Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2003, ch. 156, § 1; 2009, ch. 100, § 2; 2010, ch. 16, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b)(iii) substituted “campaign finance reports under W.S. 22- 25-101 through

22-25-115

” for “a receipts and expenditures report”.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (m).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 22-29-102(a)(iii).

§ 22-29-114.
Election procedures for elections other than mail ballot elections; canvass, recount and contests.

The secretary of state, after consultation with the county clerks, shall promulgate rules setting forth election procedures for special districts to follow for the formation and succeeding elections. These rules shall apply to mail ballot elections but shall conform with W.S.

22-29-115

and

22-29-116

. These rules shall include the designation of polling places, appointment of election judges, polling place hours, filing periods, filing offices, ballot preparation, appointment of a canvassing board, term commencement, other provisions relating to canvass, recount, contests and other election procedures.

If the election is not held in conjunction with another election which requires the polls to be kept open for other hours, it shall not be necessary to keep the polls open at any election more than five (5) consecutive hours at any time between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election, as set forth in the notice of election.

The entire district, or any portion thereof designated by the commissioners ordering the election, may constitute an election precinct, as set forth in the notice of election.

An elector shall vote only at the polling place for the election precinct in which he resides. This subsection shall not apply to mail ballot elections.

Any special district election conducted by the county clerk shall be canvassed by the county canvassing board or a canvassing board appointed by the county clerk, consisting of two (2) electors and the county clerk. If more than one (1) county is involved, the election shall be canvassed in accordance with chapter 16 of the Wyoming Election Code of 1973, as amended, by a canvassing board drawn from the membership of the appropriate county canvassing boards appointed by the appropriate county commissioners. The commissioners shall notify the county clerks of the canvassing board appointments. Any special district election not conducted by a county clerk shall be canvassed by a special district canvassing board. The special district canvassing board shall consist of the district secretary and two (2) electors appointed by the district board. Any canvass shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 16 of the Wyoming Election Code of 1973, as amended. The canvass shall be conducted within seven (7) business days of the election. The canvassing board shall have the authority to call for a special election in accordance with W.S.

22-16-122

. The canvassing board shall:

Cause minutes of the meeting and an abstract of the votes to be compiled showing the following information:

The total number of votes cast in the election;

The number of votes received by each person receiving votes at each polling place;

A statement of the offices to be filled and a declaration of the winners;

The result of any ballot proposition.

Sign the abstract which then constitutes the certification of the canvassing board and file the abstract with the county clerk at the conclusion of the canvassing board meeting.

A candidate may request a recount of the vote in accordance with W.S.

22-16-110

.

Any special district election may be contested in accordance with chapter 17 of the Wyoming Election Code of 1973, as amended.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-29-113

; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; ch. 115, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2015 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (e), inserted “business” in the next-to-last full sentence.

§ 22-29-115.
Mail ballot elections; definitions; general provisions.

This section does not apply to a special district election held in conjunction with a primary, general or statewide special election. As used in W.S.

22-29-116

:

“Election official” means the county clerk for a formation election and a county clerk or district secretary for other elections;

“Mail ballot election” means an election for which voters cast ballots in a special district election by mail and in accordance with this chapter;

“Mail ballot package” means the packet of information provided by the election official to voters eligible to vote in the mail ballot election;

“Transmit” means to mail or to personally deliver.

The secretary of state, after consultation with the county clerks, shall establish procedures for conducting mail ballot elections.

Regardless of the number of eligible voters within the district, the county commissioners may order the formation election to be a mail ballot election.

Regardless of the number of voters within its boundaries, a special district may, by rule or bylaw of its governing body, conduct by mail ballot elections to enlarge, withdraw, merge, consolidate, dissolve or such other election required by the principal act. A special district may by rule or bylaw pay the return postage of mail and absentee ballots.

Upon the adoption of the rule or bylaw to conduct an election by the mail ballot procedure, each voter shall be mailed a mail ballot.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-29-114

; Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 3.